Hawaii statutes.
§396-6 Employer responsibility: safe place
of employment; safety devices and safeguards. (a) Every employer shall
furnish to each of the employer's employees employment and a place of
employment which are safe as well as free from recognized hazards. No employer
shall require or direct or permit or suffer any employee to go or be in any
employment or place of employment which is not free from recognized hazards
that are causing or likely to cause death or serious physical harm to employees
or which does not comply with occupational safety and health standards, rules,
regulations, citations, or orders made pursuant to this chapter except for the
specific purpose of abating said hazard.

(b) Every employer shall furnish and use
safety devices and safeguards, and shall adopt and use practices, means,
methods, operations, and processes which are reasonably adequate to render such
employment and place of employment safe.

(c) No employer shall construct or cause to be
constructed any place of employment that is not safe, and no employer shall
occupy or maintain any unsafe place of employment.

(d) Every employer shall make such reports as
the Secretary of Labor may require pursuant to Public Law 91596 section 8(c).

(e) Each employer shall make, keep and preserve
and make available to the department such records regarding the employer's
activities relating to this chapter as the department may prescribe by
regulation as necessary or appropriate for the enforcement of this chapter or
for developing information regarding the causes and prevention of occupational
accidents and illnesses.

The department shall prescribe regulations
requiring employers to maintain accurate records of, and to make periodic
reports on work related deaths, injuries and illnesses other than minor
injuries requiring only first aid treatment and which do not involve medical
treatment, loss of consciousness, restriction of work or motion, or transfer to
another job.

(f) All employers shall be required to post
prominently in the working place all posters and information provided by the
department for posting as well as notices informing employees of their rights
and obligations under this chapter. [L 1972, c 57, pt of §1; am L 1974, c 152,
§3; am L 1976, c 95, §6; gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Statute recognizes limited exception relating to employees
permitted on premises to abate specific hazard. 59 H. 53, 575 P.2d 1299 (1978).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next